Nevada, session 83, SB507.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 232.8413 and 232.8415 and sections
2 to 6, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in sections 3 and 4 of this act have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB507_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 3. “Deputy Director” means the Deputy Director of the
Office.
Sec. 4. “Office” means the Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and Councils Standards of the Department created
by NRS 232.8413.
Sec. 5. 1. The Office may, by regulation:
(a) Prescribe a fee to cover the costs incurred by the Office for
any service provided by the Office to a professional or
occupational licensing board under the purview of the Office
pursuant to NRS 232.8415; and
(b) Adopt such procedures as the Office may deem appropriate
for the billing or collection of such fees from a professional or
occupational licensing board to which such a service is provided.
2. Any money the Office receives pursuant to this section
must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the Account.
3. As used in this section, “Account” means the Office of
Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils Standards Account
created by section 6 of this act.
Sec. 6. 1. The Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards Account is hereby created in the State General
Fund. The Account must be administered by the Deputy Director
and money in the Account may be expended only to carry out the
provisions of NRS 232.8413 and 232.8415 and sections 2 to 6,
inclusive, of this act.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
3. Any money in the Account and any unexpended
appropriations made to the Account from the State General Fund
remaining at the end of a fiscal year do not revert to the State
General Fund, and the balance in the Account must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
4. The Deputy Director may apply for and accept any gift,
grant, donation or appropriation for deposit in the Account.
Sec. 7. NRS 232.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.505 As used in NRS 232.505 to 232.866, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act, unless the context requires
otherwise:
1. “Department” means the Department of Business and
Industry.
2. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
Sec. 8. NRS 232.8415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.8415 1. The Office [of Nevada Boards, Commissions
and Councils Standards] shall be responsible for:
(a) Centralized administration;
-
*SB507_R1*

– 4 –
(b) A uniform set of standards for investigations, licensing
and discipline, including, without limitation, separating the roles and
responsibilities for occupational licensure from the roles and
responsibilities for occupational discipline;
(c) A uniform set of standards for internal controls;
(d) A uniform set of standards for legal representation;
(e) A consistent set of structural standards for boards and
commissions;
(f) Transparency and consumer protection; and
(g) Efficacy and efficiency.
2. To the extent permitted by the Nevada Constitution and
federal law, all professional and occupational licensing boards
created by the Legislature shall be under the purview of the Office,
including, without limitation:
(a) The Nevada State Board of Accountancy created by
NRS 628.035.
(b) The Board of Examiners for Alcohol, Drug and Gambling
Counselors created by NRS 641C.150.
(c) The State Board of Architecture, Interior Design and
Residential Design created by NRS 623.050.
(d) The Board of Athletic Trainers created by NRS 640B.170.
(e) The State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation Board created by
NRS 643.020.
(f) The Board of Applied Behavior Analysis created by
NRS 641D.200.
(g) The Chiropractic Physicians’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 634.020.
(h) The State Contractors’ Board created by NRS 624.040.
(i) The Commission on Construction Education created by
NRS 624.570.
(j) The State Board of Cosmetology created by NRS 644A.200.
(k) The Certified Court Reporters’ Board of Nevada created by
NRS 656.040.
(l) The Board of Dental Examiners of Nevada created by
NRS 631.120.
(m) The Committee on Dental Hygiene and Dental Therapy
created by NRS 631.205.
(n) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors created by NRS 625.100.
(o) The Nevada Funeral and Cemetery Services Board created
by NRS 642.020.
(p) The Nevada Board of Homeopathic Medical Examiners
created pursuant to NRS 630A.100.
(q) The State Board of Landscape Architecture created by
NRS 623A.080.
-
*SB507_R1*

– 5 –
(r) The Board of Examiners for Marriage and Family Therapists
and Clinical Professional Counselors created by NRS 641A.090.
(s) The Board of Massage Therapy created by NRS 640C.150.
(t) The Board of Medical Examiners created pursuant to
NRS 630.050.
(u) The State Board of Nursing created by NRS 632.020.
(v) The Advisory Committee on Nursing Assistants and
Medication Aides created by NRS 632.072.
(w) The Board of Occupational Therapy created by
NRS 640A.080.
(x) The Board of Dispensing Opticians created by NRS 637.030.
(y) The Nevada State Board of Optometry created by
NRS 636.030.
(z) The State Board of Oriental Medicine created by
NRS 634A.030.
(aa) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine created pursuant
to NRS 633.181.
(bb) [The Commission on Postsecondary Education created by
NRS 394.383.
(cc)] The State Board of Pharmacy created by NRS 639.020.
[(dd)] (cc) The Nevada Physical Therapy Board created by
NRS 640.030.
[(ee)] (dd) The State Board of Podiatry created by
NRS 635.020.
[(ff)] (ee) The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board created by
NRS 648.020.
[(gg)] (ff) The Board of Psychological Examiners created by
NRS 641.030.
[(hh)] (gg) The Board of Environmental Health Specialists
created by NRS 625A.030.
[(ii)] (hh) The Board of Examiners for Social Workers created
pursuant to NRS 641B.100.
[(jj)] (ii) The Speech-Language Pathology, Audiology and
Hearing Aid Dispensing Board created by NRS 637B.100.
[(kk)] (jj) The Nevada State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners created by NRS 638.020.
Sec. 8.3. NRS 706.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.471 1. Each taxicab motor carrier shall, before
commencing the operation defined in NRS 706.126 and annually
thereafter, pay to the Nevada Transportation Authority for each
taxicab which it operates, including each taxicab it leases pursuant
to NRS 706.473, an annual fee of not more than $75 as determined
by a regulation of the Nevada Transportation Authority.
2. The annual fee provided in this section must be paid on or
before January 1 of each year.
-
*SB507_R1*

– 6 –
3. The annual fee must be reduced one-twelfth for each month
which has elapsed since the beginning of the calendar year in which
operation is begun.
4. In addition to the annual fee provided in subsection 1, each
taxicab motor carrier shall:
(a) Charge and collect a technology fee in an amount set by the
Nevada Transportation Authority or the Taxicab Authority, as
applicable, for each compensable trip by a taxicab which it operates,
including each taxicab it leases pursuant to NRS 706.473; and
(b) Remit to the Nevada Transportation Authority [,] or the
Taxicab Authority, as applicable, not later than the 10th day of each
month, all fees collected by the operator pursuant to this subsection
for the immediately preceding month.
 The fee charged pursuant to this subsection may only be charged
within a county whose population is 700,000 or more, and may be
added to the passenger fare charged as indicated on the taximeter.
5. Any person who fails to pay any fee on or before the date
provided in this section shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the
amount of the fee plus interest on the amount of the fee at the rate of
1 percent per month or fraction of a month from the date the fee is
due until the date of payment.
Sec. 8.7. Chapter 706A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A transportation network company may enter into an
agreement with a taxicab motor carrier or a person that provides
electronic hailing services for a taxicab motor carrier for the
carrier to receive from the company connections to potential
passengers through the digital network or software application
services of the company in exchange for a fee provided to the
company.
2. A trip undertaken by a taxicab motor carrier as a result of
a connection provided by a company pursuant to an agreement
entered into pursuant to subsection 1 is not subject to the
provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto and the taxicab driver does not constitute a driver for the
purposes of this chapter.
3. A trip described in subsection 1 is subject to all applicable
provisions of chapter 706 of NRS and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, except that:
(a) The passenger fare charged for the trip may deviate from
the passenger fare determined by the taximeter in the taxicab if
the passenger requested the trip using the digital network or
software application service of the company and an estimate of the
passenger fare for the trip was disclosed within the digital network
-
*SB507_R1*

– 7 –
or software application service of the company before the
commencement of the trip.
(b) The passenger fare charged for the trip may deviate from
schedules and tariffs filed by the taxicab motor carrier with the
Authority pursuant to NRS 706.321 and instead be based on the
rates charged by the company.
(c) The trip is not subject to any requirement established by the
regulations adopted pursuant to chapter 706 of NRS which
require the receipt provided to the passenger to include the
amount of the fare as indicated on the taximeter.
(d) The taxicab driver is not required to comply with any
restrictions established by the regulations adopted pursuant to
chapter 706 of NRS which restrict the geographic area that the
taxicab driver may serve.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Taxicab motor carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.126.
(b) “Taximeter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8817.
Sec. 9. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB507_R1*